Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1201
Judicial Resources Commission; created; membership; quorum.

There is hereby created the Judicial Resources Commission consisting of: (1) Four judges, including one district court judge, one county court judge, one separate juvenile court judge, and one Justice or judge of the Supreme Court, all of whom shall be appointed by the Supreme Court; (2) one member of the Nebraska State Bar Association from each of the six judicial districts prescribed in Article V, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska who shall have practiced law in this state for at least ten years and who shall be appointed by the Executive Council of the Nebraska State Bar Association; and (3) one citizen from each of the six judicial districts prescribed in Article V, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska appointed by the Governor and one additional citizen who shall be appointed at large, none of whom shall be (a) a justice or judge of the Supreme Court or a judge of any other court, active or retired, (b) a member of the Nebraska State Bar Association, or (c) an immediate family member of any person listed in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subdivision. The Justice or judge of the Supreme Court serving on the commission shall also serve as chairperson of the commission. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commission shall act by a vote of the majority of its members.

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 24-809.01;

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 3.